Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.590

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Order—Form.

The mandatory benefits assignment order shall be in the following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE OF

WASHINGTON IN AND FOR THE COUNTY OF

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . .,

Obligee

No. . . . .

vs.

MANDATORY

. . . .,

BENEFITS ASSIGNMENT

Obligor

ORDER

. . . .,

The Department of Retirement Systems

of the State of Washington

THE STATE OF WASHINGTON TO: The Department of Retirement Systems

AND TO:

. . . .

Obligor

The above-named obligee claims that the above-named obligor is more than fifteen days past due in spousal maintenance payments and that the total amount of such past due payments is equal to or greater than one hundred dollars or that the obligor has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the department of retirement systems. The amount of the accrued past due spousal maintenance debt as of this date is . . . . . . dollars. If the obligor is receiving periodic retirement payments from the department, the amount to be withheld from the obligor's benefits to satisfy such accrued spousal maintenance is . . . . . . dollars per month and the amount to be withheld from the obligor's benefits to satisfy current and continuing spousal maintenance is . . . . . . per month. Upon satisfaction of the accrued past due spousal maintenance debt, the department shall withhold only . . . . . . dollars, the amount necessary to satisfy current and continuing spousal maintenance from the obligor's benefits. If the obligor has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the department, the amount to be withheld from the obligor's benefits to satisfy such accrued spousal maintenance is . . . . . . dollars.

You are hereby commanded to answer this order by filling in the attached form according to the instructions, and you must mail or deliver the original of the answer to the court, one copy to the obligee or obligee's attorney, and one copy to the obligor within twenty days after service of this benefits assignment order upon you.

(1) If you are currently paying periodic retirement payments to the obligor, then you shall do as follows:

(a) Withhold from the obligor's retirement payments each month the lesser of:

(i) The sum of the specified arrearage payment amount plus the specified current spousal maintenance amount; or

(ii) Fifty percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor.

(b) The total amount withheld above is subject to the mandatory benefits assignment order, and all other sums may be disbursed to the obligor.

You shall continue to withhold the ordered amounts from nonexempt benefits of the obligor until notified by a court order that the mandatory benefits assignment order has been modified or terminated. You shall promptly notify the court if and when the obligor is no longer receiving periodic retirement payments from the department of retirement systems.

You shall deliver the withheld benefits to the clerk of the court that issued this mandatory benefits assignment order each month, but the first delivery shall occur no sooner than twenty days after your receipt of this mandatory benefits assignment order.

(2) If you are not currently paying periodic retirement payments to the obligor but the obligor has requested a withdrawal of accumulated contributions, then you shall do as follows:

(a) Withhold from the obligor's benefits the sum of the specified arrearage payment amount plus the specified interest amount, up to one hundred percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor.

(b) The total amount withheld above is subject to the mandatory benefits assignment order, and all other sums may be disbursed to the obligor.

You shall mail a copy of this order and a copy of your answer to the obligor at the mailing address in the department's files as soon as is reasonably possible. This mandatory benefits assignment order has priority over any assignment or order of execution, garnishment, attachment, levy, or similar legal process authorized by Washington law, except for a wage assignment order for child support under chapter 26.18 RCW or order to withhold or deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW.

NOTICE TO OBLIGOR: YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO REQUEST A HEARING IN THE SUPERIOR COURT THAT ISSUED THIS MANDATORY BENEFITS ASSIGNMENT ORDER, TO REQUEST THAT THE COURT QUASH, MODIFY, OR TERMINATE THE MANDATORY BENEFITS ASSIGNMENT ORDER.

DATED THIS . . . . day of . . . ., (year) . . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Obligee,

Judge/Court Commissioner

or obligee's attorney

[ 2016 c 202 s 32; 1991 c 365 s 8; 1987 c 326 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.